Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1858
Metropolitan utilities district; solicitations prohibited; proposals authorized; when.

Whenever any city is furnished natural gas pursuant to a franchise agreement with a jurisdictional utility, a metropolitan utilities district shall not solicit such city to enter into a franchise agreement or promote discontinuance of natural gas service with the utility unless a specific invitation to submit a proposal on such a franchise has been formally presented to the board of directors of the metropolitan utilities district. For purposes of this section, a specific invitation to submit a proposal means a resolution adopted by the governing body of the city.

Whenever a specific invitation to submit a proposal is received by the board of directors of a metropolitan utilities district, the invitation will be considered by the board at its next regularly scheduled monthly meeting.

Laws 1999, LB 78, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 57-1301;

Laws 2006, LB 1249, § 5.